Hawaii statutes.
§348F-7 Disability and communication access
board special fund. (a) There is established the disability and
communication access board special fund to be administered by the disability
and communication access board. All moneys received
by the disability and communication access board shall be deposited into the
special fund. All interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited into this
special fund shall become part of the special fund.

(b) Moneys in the
disability and communication access board special fund shall be expended to
defray costs of administering this chapter.

(c) All moneys collected as application fees
or fees for continuing education units for credentialing of interpreters shall
be deposited into the disability and communication access board special fund.
[L 2001, c 192, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 272, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next